ro-RO: Material textil pentru scaun: Pânză; Bumbac; Nailon; Țesătură Oxford; Poliester cu strat din PVC; Poliester; Poliester reciclat; Nailon Ripstop; Altele
pt-BR: Descreve quais peças estão incluídas na embalagem (ex.: somente assentos vs assento completo + encostos de cabeça).: Lona; Algodão; Nylon; Tecido Oxford; Poliéster revestido com PVC; Poliéster; Poliéster reciclado; Nylon ripstop; Outros
zh-TW: 座椅布料: 帆布; 棉布; 尼龍; 牛津布; PVC 塗層聚酯纖維; 聚酯纖維; 再生聚酯纖維; 防撕裂尼龍; 其他
hr-HR: Tkanina za sjedalo: Platno; Pamuk; Najlon; Oxford tkanina; Poliester obložen PVC-om; Poliester; Reciklirani poliester; Ripstop najlon; Ostalo
lt-LT: Sėdynės audinys: Drobė; Medvilnė; Nailonas; Oksfordo audinys; PVC dengtas poliesteris; Poliesteris; Perdirbtas poliesteris; Nailonas „Ripstop“; Kita
en: Seat fabric: Canvas; Cotton; Nylon; Oxford fabric; PVC-coated polyester; Polyester; Recycled polyester; Ripstop nylon; Other
el: Ύφασμα καθισμάτων: Καμβάς; Βαμβάκι; Νάιλον; Ύφασμα Oxford; Πολυεστέρας με επικάλυψη PVC; Πολυεστέρας; Ανακυκλωμένος πολυεστέρας; Νάιλον ripstop; Άλλο
ru: Ткань сиденья: Канвас; Хлопок; Нейлон; Ткань оксфорд; Полиэстер с покрытием из ПВХ; Полиэстер; Переработанный полиэстер; Нейлон рипстоп; Другое
es: Tela del asiento: Lona; Algodón; Nailon; Tela Oxford; Poliéster recubierto de PVC; Poliéster; Poliéster reciclado; Nailon ripstop; Otro
tr: Koltuk kumaşı: Kanvas; Pamuk; Naylon; Oxford kumaş; PVC kaplı polyester; Polyester; Geri dönüştürülmüş polyester; Yırtılmaz naylon; Diğer
hu: Üléskárpit anyaga: Vászon; Pamut; Nejlon; Oxford szövet; PVC-bevonatú poliészter; Poliészter; Újrahasznosított poliészter; Ripstop nejlon; Egyéb
sv: Sitstyg: Kanvas; Bomull; Nylon; Oxfordtyg; PVC-belagd polyester; Polyester; Återvunnen polyester; Ripstop-nylon; Övrigt
ko: 시트 원단: 캔버스; 면; 나일론; 옥스퍼드 원단; PVC 코팅 폴리에스터; 폴리에스터; 재생 폴리에스터; 립스탑 나일론; 기타
pt-PT: Tecido do assento: Lona; Algodão; Nylon; Tecido Oxford; Poliéster revestido a PVC; Poliéster; Poliéster reciclado; Nylon antidesgaste; Outro
pl: Tkanina siedziska: Płótno; Bawełna; Nylon; Tkanina Oxford; Poliester powlekany PVC; Poliester; Poliester z recyklingu; Nylon ripstop; Inne
bg-BG: Плат на седалката: Канвас; Памук; Найлон; Оксфорд (плат); Полиестер с PVC покритие; Полиестер; Рециклиран полиестер; Рипстоп найлон; Други
da: Sædestof: Lærred; Bomuld; Nylon; Oxford-stof; PVC-belagt polyester; Polyester; Genanvendt polyester; Ripstop-nylon; Andet
zh-CN: 座椅面料: 帆布; 棉; 尼龙; 牛津布; PVC 涂层聚酯纤维; 聚酯纤维; 回收聚酯纤维; 防撕裂尼龙; 其他
cs: Látka sedadla: Plátno; Bavlna; Nylon; Látka Oxford; Polyester potažený PVC; Polyester; Recyklovaný polyester; Ripstop nylon; Jiné
fi: Istuinkangas: Markiisi; Puuvilla; Nailon; Oxford-kangas; PVC-pinnoitettu polyesteri; Polyesteri; Kierrätetty polyesteri; Ripstop-nailon; Muu
ja: 座面生地: キャンバス; コットン; ナイロン; オックスフォード生地; PVCコーティングポリエステル; ポリエステル; 再生ポリエステル; リップストップナイロン; その他
th: ผ้าหุ้มเบาะ: ผ้าแคนวาส; ผ้าฝ้าย; ไนลอน; ผ้าอ็อกซ์ฟอร์ด; โพลีเอสเตอร์เคลือบ PVC; โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลีเอสเตอร์รีไซเคิล; ไนลอนริปสตอป; อื่นๆ
nl: Stoelstof: Canvas; Katoen; Nylon; Oxford-stof; Polyester met pvc-coating; Polyester; Gerecycled polyester; Ripstopnylon; Overig
de: Sitzmaterial: Segeltuch; Baumwolle; Nylon; Oxford-Gewebe; PVC-beschichtetes Polyester; Polyester; Recyceltes Polyester; Ripstop-Nylon; Sonstige
sl-SI: Tkanina sedeža: Platno; Bombaž; Najlon; Tkanina oxford; Poliester s premazom PVC; Poliester; Recikliran poliester; Najlon ripstop; Drugo
it: Tessuto del sedile: Tela; Cotone; Nylon; Tessuto Oxford; Poliestere rivestito in PVC; Poliestere; Poliestere riciclato; Nylon ripstop; Altro
sk-SK: Materiál poťahu sedadla: Plátno; Bavlna; Nylon; Tkanina Oxford; Polyester potiahnutý PVC; Polyester; Recyklovaný polyester; Nylon s úpravou ripstop; Iné
fr: Tissu du siège: Toile; Coton; Nylon; Tissu Oxford; Polyester enduit de PVC; Polyester; Polyester recyclé; Nylon indéchirable; Autre
nb: Setestoff: Lerret; Bomull; Nylon; Oxford-stoff; PVC-belagt polyester; Polyester; Resirkulert polyester; Ripstop-nylon; Annet
vi: Vải bọc ghế: Vải canvas; Cotton; Nylon; Vải oxford; Polyester phủ PVC; Polyester; Polyester tái chế; Nylon chống rách; Khác